Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.465

Time of sale requirement—Unlawful practice.

(1) In the preparation and use of written contracts, it is unlawful for a commission merchant to include in such contracts a requirement that a consignor give up all involvement in determining the time the consignor's agricultural products will be sold.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to agricultural products consigned to a commission merchant under a written pooling agreement.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to seeds consigned to a commission merchant.

[ 2004 c 212 s 3; 1991 c 109 s 24.]